Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.015

Cash management duties.

Within the policies and procedures established pursuant to RCW 43.41.110(13) and 43.88.160(1), the state treasurer shall take such actions as are necessary to ensure the effective cash management of public funds. This cash management shall include the authority to represent the state in all contractual relationships with financial institutions. The state treasurer may delegate cash management responsibilities to the affected agencies.

[ 2019 c 147 s 3; 1993 c 500 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—Effective date—1993 c 500: See notes following RCW 43.41.180.